Utah statutes.
31A-23a-801.   Licensure.
(1)  A person, firm, association, or corporation may not act as a reinsurance
intermediary-broker in this state if the reinsurance intermediary-broker
maintains an office either directly or as a member or employee of a firm or
association, or an officer, director, or employee of a corporation unless:
(a)  in this state, the reinsurance intermediary-broker is a licensed producer
in this state; or
(b)  in another state, the reinsurance intermediary-broker is a licensed
producer in this state or another state having a licensing law substantially
similar to this part, or the reinsurance intermediary-broker is licensed in
this state as a nonresident reinsurance intermediary.
(2)  A person, firm, association, or corporation may not act as a reinsurance
intermediary-manager:
(a)  for a reinsurer domiciled in this state, unless the reinsurance
intermediary-manager is a licensed producer in this state;
(b)  in this state, if the reinsurance intermediary-manager maintains an
office either directly or as a member or employee of a firm or association, or
as an officer, director, or employee of a corporation in this state, unless
the reinsurance intermediary-manager is a licensed producer in this state; or
(c)  in another state for a nondomestic insurer, unless the reinsurance
intermediary-manager is a licensed producer in this state or another state
having a licensing law substantially similar to this chapter, or the person is
licensed in this state as a nonresident reinsurance intermediary.
(3)  The commissioner may require a bond in an amount he finds acceptable for
the protection of each reinsurer represented.
(4) (a)  The commissioner may issue a reinsurance intermediary license to any
person, firm, association, or corporation which has complied with the
requirements of this chapter.
(i)  Any license issued to a firm or association will authorize all the
members of the firm or association, and any designated employees, to act as
reinsurance intermediaries under the license.  Each member, employee, or
similar person shall be named in the application and any supplements to the
application.
(ii)  Any license issued to a corporation shall authorize all of the officers,
directors, and any designated employees to act as reinsurance intermediaries
on behalf of the corporation, and all authorized persons shall be named in the
application and any supplements to the application.
(b)  If the applicant for a reinsurance intermediary license is a nonresident,
the applicant, as a condition precedent to receiving or holding a license,
shall designate the commissioner as agent for service of process in the
manner, and with the same legal effect, provided for by this title for
designation of service of process upon unauthorized insurers.  The applicant
also shall furnish the commissioner with the name and address of a resident of
this state upon whom notices or orders of the commissioner or process
affecting the nonresident reinsurance intermediary may be served.  The
licensee shall promptly notify the commissioner in writing of every change in
its designated agent for service of process, and the change does not become
effective until acknowledged by the commissioner.
(5)  The commissioner may refuse to issue a reinsurance intermediary license
if he determines that the applicant, any one named on the application, or any
member, principal, officer, or director of the applicant, is not trustworthy,
or that any controlling person of the applicant is not trustworthy to act as a
reinsurance intermediary, or that any of the persons named has given cause for
revocation or suspension of the license, or has failed to comply with any
prerequisite for the issuance of the license.  Upon written request the
commissioner will furnish a summary of the basis for his refusal to issue a
license. The summary document shall be confidential.
(6)  Licensed attorneys-at-law of this state when acting in their professional
capacity as attorneys are exempt from this section.
